Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1810
Livestock lanes; driving livestock on adjacent highway; penalty.

Any person who shall drive or assist in driving any cattle or livestock over a public road where such lane or driveway has been established as provided in section 39-1808 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. V, § 10, p. 554;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 217.